Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 2. State Board of Elections.

§ 24.2-102.
Appointment; terms; Commissioner of Elections; prohibited activities.

The State Board of Elections is continued and shall consist of five members appointed by the Governor from the qualified voters of the Commonwealth, subject to confirmation by the General Assembly. In the appointment of the Board, representation shall be given to each of the political parties having the highest and next highest number of votes in the Commonwealth for Governor at the last preceding gubernatorial election. Three Board members shall be of the political party that cast the highest number of votes for Governor at that election. When the Governor was not elected as the candidate of a political party, representation shall be given to each of the political parties having the highest and next highest number of members of the General Assembly at the time of the appointment and three Board members shall be of the political party having the highest number of members in the General Assembly. Each political party entitled to an appointment may make and file recommendations with the Governor for the appointment. Its recommendations shall contain the names of at least three qualified voters of the Commonwealth. Appointments shall be made with due consideration of geographical representation, and no two Board members shall reside in the same congressional district.After the initial staggering of terms, Board members shall serve terms of four years, which shall begin on February 1 of the year of the appointment. Vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired terms. No member shall be eligible for more than two successive four-year terms. A member appointed for an unexpired term may be appointed for the two succeeding four-year terms.Each year the Governor shall designate one Board member to be the chair of the Board and one Board member to be the vice-chair. The chair and vice-chair shall be members of opposite political parties.No member of the Board shall be eligible to offer for or hold an office to be filled in whole or in part by qualified voters in the Commonwealth. If a member resigns to offer for or hold such office, the vacancy shall be filled as provided in this section.No member of the Board shall serve as the chairman of a state, local, or district level political party committee or as a paid or volunteer worker in the campaign of a candidate for nomination or election to an office filled by election in whole or in part by qualified voters in the Commonwealth.

The Governor shall appoint a Commissioner of Elections, subject to confirmation by the General Assembly, to head the Department of Elections and to act as its principal administrative officer. The Commissioner shall be appointed to a term of four years, which shall begin on July 1 of the year following a gubernatorial election. The Commissioner shall be a qualified voter of the Commonwealth.The Commissioner shall receive the salary fixed by law. He may employ the personnel required to carry out the duties required by law and imposed by the Board.The Commissioner shall not be eligible to offer for or hold an office to be filled in whole or in part by qualified voters in the Commonwealth. His candidacy for or election to such office shall vacate his position as Commissioner, and the Governor shall fill the vacancy for the unexpired term.The Governor shall not appoint as Commissioner (i) any person who is the spouse of a member of the Board or of a person seeking election to an office or holding an elective office that is filled in whole or in part by qualified voters in the Commonwealth; (ii) any person, or the spouse of any person, who is the grandparent, parent, sibling, child, or grandchild of a member of the Board; or (iii) any person, or the spouse of any person, who is the grandparent, parent, sibling, child, or grandchild of a person seeking election to an office or holding an elective office that is filled in whole or in part by qualified voters in the Commonwealth. The Commissioner shall submit his resignation to the Governor on the date that any such person files as a candidate for election to an office that is filled in whole or in part by qualified voters in the Commonwealth.The Commissioner shall not serve as the chairman of a state, local, or district level political party committee or as a paid or volunteer worker in the campaign of a candidate for nomination or election to an office filled by election in whole or in part by qualified voters in the Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-24, 24-345.10; 1952, c. 509; 1956, c. 392; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-18; 1973, c. 30; 1975, c. 515; 1977, c. 576; 1980, c. 728; 1984, c. 444; 1993, c. 641; 2007, c. 350; 2013, c. 542; 2020, cc. 353, 619.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 353 and 619, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021.”

Acts 2020, cc. 353 and 619, cl. 3 provides: “That the two members added to the State Board of Elections pursuant to this act shall be appointed for terms of four years, to begin February 1, 2021, and to end on January 31, 2025. One member shall represent the political party of the Governor, and one member shall represent the political party that had the next highest number of votes in the Commonwealth at the last preceding gubernatorial election.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 350 added the fourth and fifth paragraphs.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 542, effective July 1, 2014, deleted “except the Secretary” following “No member” in the second paragraph; in the third paragraph, substituted “appoint a Commissioner of Elections” for “designate one member of the Board as the Secretary,” “Commissioner of Elections” for “Secretary,” and “the State Board of Elections” for “this title. The provisions of §

2.2-106

shall not apply to this section.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 353 and 619 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and added subsection B; and in subsection A, in the first paragraph, substituted “five” for “three” in the first sentence, “Three” for “Two” and “party that” for “party which” in the third sentence, and “three” for “two” in the fourth sentence, and added the last sentence; in the second paragraph, rewrote the first sentence, which read: “Board members shall serve four-year terms beginning February 1, 1995, and each fourth year thereafter”; rewrote the third paragraph, which read:
“The Governor shall appoint a Commissioner of Elections, who shall receive the salary fixed by law. The Commissioner of Elections may employ the personnel required to carry out the duties imposed by the State Board of Elections”; and in the fifth paragraph, inserted “or volunteer.”

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Election Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 403 (2009).

§ 24.2-103.
Powers and duties in general; report.

The State Board, through the Department of Elections, shall supervise and coordinate the work of the county and city electoral boards and of the registrars to obtain uniformity in their practices and proceedings and legality and purity in all elections. Its supervision shall ensure that major risks to election integrity are (i) identified and assessed and (ii) addressed as necessary to promote election uniformity, legality, and purity. It shall make rules and regulations and issue instructions and provide information consistent with the election laws to the electoral boards and registrars to promote the proper administration of election laws. Electoral boards and registrars shall provide information requested by the State Board and shall follow (a) the elections laws and (b) the rules and regulations of the State Board insofar as they do not conflict with Virginia or federal law. The State Board shall post on the Internet within three business days any rules or regulations made by the State Board. Upon request and at a reasonable charge not to exceed the actual cost incurred, the State Board shall provide to any requesting political party or candidate, within three days of the receipt of the request, copies of any instructions or information provided by the State Board to the local electoral boards and registrars.

The State Board, through the Department of Elections, shall ensure that the members of the electoral boards are properly trained to carry out their duties by offering training annually, or more often, as it deems appropriate, and without charging any fees to the electoral boards for the training.

The State Board, through the Department of Elections, shall conduct a certification program for the general registrars and shall require each general registrar to receive certification through such program from the Department within 12 months of his initial appointment or any subsequent reappointment. The State Board may grant a waiver requested by a local electoral board to extend, on a case-by-case basis, this deadline by up to three months. The State Board shall develop a training curriculum for the certification program and standards for completing the program and maintaining certification, including required hours of annual training. No fees shall be charged to a general registrar for any required training as part of the certification program. The State Board shall review the certification program every four years, or more often as it deems appropriate.

The State Board shall set the training standards for the officers of election and shall develop standardized training programs for the officers of election to be conducted by the local electoral boards and the general registrars. Training of the officers of election shall be conducted and certified as provided by §

24.2-115.2

. The State Board shall provide standardized training materials for such training and shall also offer on the Department of Elections website a training course for officers of election. The content of the online training course shall be consistent with the standardized training programs developed pursuant to this section. The State Board shall review the standardized training materials and the content of the online training course every two years in the year immediately following a general election for federal office.

The State Board may institute proceedings pursuant to §

24.2-234

for the removal of any member of an electoral board who fails to discharge the duties of his office in accordance with law. The State Board may petition the local electoral board to remove from office any general registrar who fails to discharge the duties of his office according to law. The State Board may institute proceedings pursuant to §

24.2-234

for the removal of a general registrar if the local electoral board refuses to remove the general registrar and the State Board finds that the failure to remove the general registrar has a material adverse effect upon the conduct of either the registrar’s office or any election. Any action taken by the State Board pursuant to this subsection shall require a recorded majority vote of the Board.

The State Board may petition a circuit court or the Supreme Court, whichever is appropriate, for a writ of mandamus or prohibition, or other available legal relief, for the purpose of ensuring that elections are conducted as provided by law.

The Department of Elections shall supervise its own staff to assure that no member of its staff shall serve (i) as the chairman of a political party or other officer of a state-, local-, or district-level political party committee or (ii) as a paid or volunteer worker in the campaign of a candidate for nomination or election to an office filled by election in whole or in part by the qualified voters of the Commonwealth.

The Department of Elections shall employ a Director of Operations who shall be responsible for managing the day-to-day operations at the Department of Elections and ensuring (i) fulfillment of the Department’s mission and responsibilities; (ii) compliance with state and federal election laws and regulations; and (iii) compliance with the Department’s business, administrative, and financial policies. This position shall be a full-time classified position subject to the Virginia Personnel Act (§

2.2-2900

et seq.).

The State Board shall adopt a seal for its use and bylaws for its own proceedings.

The State Board shall submit an annual report to the Governor and the General Assembly on the activities of the State Board and the Department of Elections in the previous year. Such report shall be governed by the provisions of §

2.2-608

.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-24, 24-25, 24-345.10, 24-345.11; 1952, c. 509; 1956, c. 392; 1970, c. 462, §§ 24.1-18, 24.1-19; 1973, c. 30; 1975, c. 515; 1977, c. 576; 1980, c. 728; 1984, c. 444; 1993, c. 641; 1999, c. 861; 2004, cc. 27, 391; 2006, c. 760; 2009, c. 407; 2010, cc. 347, 769; 2013, cc. 525, 542; 2016, cc. 752, 766; 2020, cc. 291, 353, 619, 1087, 1148.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 353 and 619, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021.”

Acts 2020, c. 1148, cl. 2 provides: “That any general registrar serving a term that began prior to the effective date of this act shall be required to complete the certification program and receive his certification no later than June 30, 2021.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 525 added subsection G.

The 2013 amendment by c. 542, effective July 1, 2014, inserted “State” preceding “Board” throughout the section; inserted “through the Department of Elections” near the beginning of subsections A and B; and substituted “Department of Elections” for “Board” near the beginning of subsection E.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 752 and 766 are identical, and rewrote subsection B, which formerly read,
“The State Board, through the Department of Elections, shall ensure that the members of the electoral boards and general registrars are properly trained to carry out their duties by offering training annually, or more often, as it deems appropriate, and without charging any fees to the electoral boards and general registrars for the training. The State Board shall set the training standards for the officers of election to be fulfilled by the local electoral boards and general registrars. The State Board shall require certification that officers of election have been trained consistent with the training standards set by the Board. Such certification shall be submitted each year prior to the November general election by the local electoral board.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 291 inserted the second sentence in subsection A and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 353 and 619 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and rewrote subsection J, which read “A telephone call between two members of the Board preparing for a meeting shall not constitute a meeting under the provisions of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.), provided that no discussion or deliberation takes place that would otherwise constitute a meeting.”

The 2020 amendment by c. 1087 inserted subsection H and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1148 deleted “and general registrars” following “electoral boards” twice in subsection B; inserted subsection C and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Election Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 403 (2009).

For annual survey article, “Election Law and Government,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 119 (2011).

§ 24.2-103.1.
Duties of Department of Elections related to redistricting.

Upon receipt of any ordinance and Geographic Information System (GIS) map sent pursuant to §

24.2-304.3

or

24.2-306

, the Department shall promptly review the ordinance and map and compare the boundaries contained within with the information in the voter registration system in order to ensure voters have been assigned to the correct districts. The Department shall notify the locality of any corrections that may be necessary.

The Department shall maintain and make available on its official website maps showing the current election district and precinct boundaries of each county and city.

History.

2019, cc. 777, 778.

§ 24.2-103.2.
Duties of the Department of Elections related to accessible absentee voting.

The Department shall make available to all localities a tool to allow a voter with a visual impairment or print disability to electronically and accessibly receive and mark his absentee ballot using screen reader assistive technology. The Department shall develop instructions regarding the use and availability of such tool, including instructions on making the tool available to voters and counting ballots voted with such tool.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 255, 471, 522.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 522, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Elections shall convene a work group to consider and evaluate methods for sorting absentee ballots by the precinct of the voter casting the absentee ballot and reporting vote totals from absentee ballots separately by each precinct. The work group shall include such persons determined by the Department of Elections as necessary or appropriate. The work group shall organize no later than July 31, 2021, and shall complete its work no later than October 31, 2021. If recommending any specific policies or legislative proposals, the work group, through the Commissioner of Elections, shall communicate such recommendations to the Chairmen of the House and Senate Committees on Privileges and Elections by November 15, 2021.”

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021, pursuant to Va. Const., Art. IV, § 13.

§ 24.2-104.
Requesting assistance for attorney for the Commonwealth; investigative committees.

The Attorney General shall have full authority to do whatever is necessary or appropriate to enforce the election laws or prosecute violations thereof. The Attorney General shall exercise the authority granted by this section to conduct an investigation, prosecute a violation, assure the enforcement of the elections laws, and report the results of the investigation to the State Board.

When the State Board is of the opinion that the public interest will be served, it may request the Attorney General, or other attorney designated by the Governor for such purpose, to assist the attorney for the Commonwealth of any jurisdiction in which election laws have been violated. When the State Board makes its request pursuant to a unanimous vote of all members, the Attorney General, or other attorney designated by the Governor, shall exercise the authority granted by this section to conduct an investigation, prosecute a violation, assure the enforcement of the election laws, and report the results of the investigation to the State Board. The Attorney General, or the other attorney designated by the Governor, shall have full authority to do whatever is necessary or appropriate to enforce the election laws or prosecute violations thereof.

The attorney for the Commonwealth or a member of the electoral board of any county or city may make a request, in writing, that the Attorney General appoint a committee to make an immediate investigation of the election practices in that city or county, accompanied by a statement under oath that substantial violations of this title have allegedly occurred which may alter or have altered the outcome of an election. On receipt of the request and statement, the Attorney General shall forthwith appoint a committee of two or more persons qualified to make the investigation. Members, officers, and employees of the Board, local electoral boards, and registrars’ offices shall not serve on the committee but may provide assistance to the committee.The Attorney General shall direct the committee to observe, investigate or supervise the election if supervision appears necessary. The committee shall make a preliminary report to the Attorney General within five days of its appointment. If its report shows that violations of this title have occurred, the Attorney General may, notwithstanding any other provision of law, authorize the prosecution of those responsible for the violations.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-27; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-21; 1989, c. 111; 1993, c. 641; 2002, cc. 785, 819; 2013, c. 768.

Cross references.

As to the Attorney General’s limited authority to institute and conduct criminal prosecutions in the circuit courts of the Commonwealth, see §

2.2-511

.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 785 and 819 are identical, and added the last sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 768 added the subsection A designator to the first paragraph and rewrote the provisions thereof, added subsection B, and designated the former last two paragraphs of the section as subsection C.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

No conflict when the Attorney General is a candidate for public office. —

There is no inherent conflict of interest presented, and, thus, no per se requirement that the Office of the Attorney General recuse from investigating and prosecuting alleged violations of election law, when the Attorney General is a candidate for public office in the same election that is under investigation. Any potential recusal of that office must be determined on a case-by-case basis.
See opinion of Attorney General to the Honorable John S. Edwards, Member, Senate of Virginia, 13-065, 2013 Va. AG LEXIS 90 (10/18/13).

§ 24.2-104.1.
Civil actions by Attorney General.

Whenever the Attorney General has reasonable cause to believe that a violation of an election law has occurred and that the rights of any voter or group of voters have been affected by such violation, the Attorney General may commence a civil action in the appropriate circuit court for appropriate relief.

In such civil action, the court may:

Award such preventive relief, including a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, or other order against the person responsible for a violation of this title, as is necessary to assure the full enjoyment of the rights granted by this title.

Assess a civil penalty against the respondent (i) in an amount not exceeding $50,000 for a first violation and (ii) in an amount not exceeding $100,000 for any subsequent violation. Such civil penalties are payable to the Voter Education and Outreach Fund established pursuant to §

24.2-131

.

Award a prevailing plaintiff reasonable attorney fees and costs.

The court or jury may award such other relief to the aggrieved person as the court deems appropriate, including compensatory damages and punitive damages.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 528, 533.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 528 and 533, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 1289 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021, pursuant to Va. Const., Art. IV, § 13.

§ 24.2-105.
Prescribing various forms.

The State Board shall prescribe appropriate forms and records for the registration of voters, conduct of elections, and implementation of this title, which shall be used throughout the Commonwealth.

The State Board shall prescribe voting and election materials in languages other than English for use by a county, city, or town that is subject to the requirements of §

24.2-128

. For purposes of this subsection, voting and election materials mean registration or voting notices, forms, and instructions. For purposes of this subsection, registration notices mean any notice of voter registration approval, denial, or cancellation, required by the provisions of Chapter 4 (§

24.2-400

et seq.).The State Board may make available voting and election materials in any additional languages other than those required by subsection A of §

24.2-128

as it deems necessary and appropriate. The State Board may accept voting and election materials translated by volunteers but shall verify the accuracy of such translations prior to making the translated materials available to a county, city, or town, or any voter.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-28; 1968, c. 97; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-22; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 247; 1975, c. 515; 1977, c. 490; 1993, c. 641; 2020, c. 719; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 528, 533.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 719, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on September 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 528 and 533, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 1289 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 719, effective September 1, 2021, added subsection B and redesignated the preceding paragraph as subsection A.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 528 and 533, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in the version of the section effective September 1, 2021, substituted “§

24.2-128

” for “§

24.2-124

” twice in subsection B.

§ 24.2-105.1.
Election and voter participation information on the Internet.

Beginning with the general election in November 1998, the State Board shall implement a system by which it shall furnish lists of candidates for all elections in the Commonwealth, and information on proposed constitutional amendments and statewide referenda prepared pursuant to §§ 30-19.9 and 30-19.10, electronically through the Internet. The Board may list other referenda issues on the Internet. The lists and information shall be made available on the Internet as far in advance of the election as practicable and remain available on the Internet at least until the day after the election.

The State Board shall provide election results and statistical information on its website. The information shall include voter turnout information which shall be calculated as the percentage of active voters who voted excluding voters assigned to inactive status pursuant to Chapter 4 (§

24.2-400

et seq.). The information shall also include the total number of registered voters and the number assigned to inactive status.

History.

1998, c. 478; 2006, c. 474; 2007, c. 340.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 474 deleted “the global information system known as” preceding “the Internet” near the end of the first sentence.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 340 added the second paragraph.

Law Review.

For an article, “Technology and the Law,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1383 (1998).

§ 24.2-105.2.
Acceptance of payments.

Any credit or debit card used to pay for any voter list must be in the name of a person or organization authorized to receive such list pursuant to §

24.2-405

.

History.

2000, cc. 510, 554; 2002, c. 719.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 719 deleted “by credit card or debit card” from the end of the section catchline; and deleted the former first sentence, which read: “The Secretary of the State Board may accept payment of charges due for voter lists, copies, fines or fees, by use of credit card or debit card.”